Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3706
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate five hundred thousand dollars from the Nebraska Health Care Cash Fund annually beginning in fiscal year 2020-21 to the Brain Injury Assistance Program for purposes of carrying out the Brain Injury Assistance Act.

Laws 2019, LB481, § 6;

Laws 2022, LB971, § 5.